Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.170

Applicants for positions with the department—Investigation and background checks.

(1) The secretary shall investigate the conviction records, pending charges, and disciplinary board final decisions of any current employee or applicant seeking or being considered for any position with the department who will or may have unsupervised access to children. This includes, but is not limited to, positions conducting comprehensive assessments, financial eligibility determinations, licensing and certification activities, investigations, surveys, or case management; or for state positions otherwise required by federal law to meet employment standards.

(2) The secretary shall require a fingerprint-based background check through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of investigation as provided in RCW 43.43.837. Unless otherwise authorized by law, the secretary shall use the information solely for the purpose of determining the character, suitability, and competence of the applicant.

(3) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the secretary such information as they may have and that the secretary may require for such purpose.

(4) Any person whose criminal history would otherwise disqualify the person under this section from a position that will or may have unsupervised access to children shall not be disqualified if the department of social and health services reviewed the person's otherwise disqualifying criminal history through the department of social and health services' background assessment review team process conducted in 2002 and determined that such person could remain in a position covered by this section, or if the otherwise disqualifying conviction or disposition has been the subject of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 801.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.